en: fondant
xx: fondant
ar: فندان
cy: ffondant
de: Fondant
fa: فوندانت
fi: sokerimassa
he: בצק סוכר
hr: fondan
io: konfekto
pl: masa cukrowa
ru: помадка
tr: şeker hamuru
uk: помадка

en: marzipan
ar: مرصبان
az: Badam xəmiri
bg: Марципан
ca: massapà
cs: marcipán
cy: Marsipán
da: Marcipan
de: marzipan
el: Αμυγδαλόπαστα
eo: Marcipano
es: mazapán, Mazapanes
et: Martsipan
eu: Mazapan
fa: خمیر بادام
fi: marsipaani
fr: massepain
gl: Mazapán
he: מרציפן
hr: marcipan
hu: marcipán
hy: Մարզիպան
id: Marzipan
io: Marcipano
it: marzapane
ja: マルチパン
kk: Марципан
ko: 마지팬
la: Martius panis
lt: Marcipanas
lv: marcipāns
ml: മാഴ്സിപാൻ
ms: Marzipan
nb: marsipan
nl: marsepein
nn: marsipan
pl: marcepan, marcepanowy, marcepanowa, marcepanowe
pt: marzipã
ro: Marțipan
ru: Марципан
sl: Marcipan
sq: Marzipani
sv: Marsipan
tr: Badem ezmesi
uk: Марципан
zh: 杏仁膏

en: prepacked marzipan
fr: massepain préemballée
it: marzapane preconfezionato

en: persipan
xx: persipan
de: Persipan
pl: percepan

en: nougat, nougats
af: Nougat
ar: نوغة
az: Nuqa
bg: Нуга
ca: nogat
cs: nugát
cy: Nyget
da: nougat
de: Nougat, nougats
el: Μαντολάτο
eo: Nugato
es: nougat
et: Nugat
eu: Nogat
fa: نوقا
fi: Nougat
fr: nougat, nougats, türkischer Honig
ga: Eithneagán
gl: nougat
he: נוגט
hr: nugat
hu: nugát
hy: Նուգա
id: Nougat
io: Nugato
it: torrone, mandorlato
ja: ヌガー
ko: 누가
la: Nucatum
lb: Nougat
lt: nuga
lv: nuga
ml: നൂഗാ
nb: nougat
nl: noga, nougat, nougats, nogas
oc: Nogat
pl: nugat, nugatowy, nugatowe, nugatowa
pt: nougat
ru: нуга
sk: Nugát
sl: nugat
sr: Нугат
sv: nougat
tr: Nuga
uk: Нуга
vi: Kẹo Hạnh Phúc
zh: 牛轧糖

en: nougat flavor paste
hr: pasta nougat okusa
it: pasta aromatizzata al torrone

en: nougat filling
hr: nougat punilo, nougat punjenje, nugat pripravak
it: ripieno di torrone
pl: nadzienie nugatowe

en: crocant, brittle
bg: крокан
de: Krokant
fi: krokantti
fr: nougatine
hr: krokant
hu: Grillázs
it: croccante
ko: 브리틀
nb: krokan
nl: Nougatine
pl: Krokant
pt: Pé de moleque
ru: Грильяж
sv: Krokant
vi: kẹo đậu phộng
zh: 花生糖

en: Praliné
de: Praliné
es: praliné
fi: praliini
fr: praliné
hr: pralina
it: pralinato
nl: praliné

en: glaze
bg: глазура
bn: গ্লেজ
cs: glazování
da: glasering, glasur
de: Glasur
eo: glaceo
es: glaseado, glaseante
eu: glaseatu
fi: kuorrute
fr: glaçage
he: זיגוג
hi: चमक
hr: glazura, bijela-glazura, glazuru
it: glassa
ja: グレーズ
ko: 글레이즈
lv: glazūra
nl: glacering
nn: Glasering
or: ଚମକ
pa: ਚਮਕ
pl: polewa, polewy, polew
ro: glazură
ru: глазурь, кондитерская глазурь, глазурь кондитерская
sq: lustrimi
sv: glasering
zh: 包糖衣

en: chocolate glaze
bg: шоколадова глазура
de: Schokoladenglasur
et: šokolaadikate, šokolaadiglasuur
fi: suklaakuorrute, suklaanmakuinen kuorrute, suklaakuorrutus
fr: Glaçage au chocolat
hr: čokoladna glazura
it: glassa al cioccolato
pl: polewa czekoladowa, polewy czekoladowej
ru: шоколадная глазурь
sv: chokladglasyr, kakaoglasyr

en: cacao glaze
hr: kakao glazura, kakaova glazura
it: glassa al cacao

fr: décoration au cacao
pl: polewa kakaowa

en: aspic, meat jelly
ba: Ҡойҡа
bg: желе
ca: Aspic
ce: Холодец
cs: huspenina
cy: asbig
de: Sulz, Aspik
eo: aspiko
es: aspic
et: Sült
fr: aspic, gelée
he: ג'לי
hr: hladetina
hu: Kocsonya
io: aspikjeleo
it: aspic, gelatina alimentare
ja: アスピック
ko: 아스픽
ky: Килкилдек
lt: Šaltiena
nb: kabaret
nl: Aspic
nn: Matretten kabaret
pl: Chołodeć, galareta, galaretka
pt: aspic
ro: Piftie
ru: холодец
sv: Sylta
th: แกงกระด้าง
tt: Койка
uk: Холодець
yi: גאלער
zh: 肉凍

en: brine
af: Pekel
an: Salmuerra
ar: أجاج
be: Рапа
bg: саламура
bn: ব্রাইন
ca: salmorra
cs: lák
da: saltlage
de: Sole, Salzlake
el: Άρμη
eo: peklakvo
es: salmuera
et: soolvesi
eu: Gatzun
fa: آب‌نمک
fi: suolaliemi, suolavesi
fr: saumure
gl: Moira
he: תמלחת
hr: salamura
hu: Telített sósvíz
id: Air garam
is: Pækill
it: salamoia
ja: 塩水
ko: 소금물
lt: Sūrymas
mn: Ханасан ус
ms: Penjerukan
nb: saltlake
nl: pekel
nn: saltlake
pl: solanka, zalewa, zalewa solankowa
pt: salmoura
ro: Saramură
ru: Рапа
sk: Soľanka
sl: Slanica
sv: saltlag, saltlake
th: น้ำเกลือเข้มข้น
tr: Salamura
uk: Ропа
vi: nước muối
zh: 濃鹽水

en: fond, stock for sauce, stocks for sauce, fond for sauce
da: fond
fr: fond, fond de sauce, fonds de sauce
hr: fond

en: broth, broths, stock, bouillon, Stocks
af: bouillon
ar: زومات
az: Bulyon
ba: һурпа
be: Булён
bg: Бульон
bn: সুরুয়া
ca: brou
cs: vývar
da: bouillon
de: Brühe, Brühen, Bouillons, Bouillon, Fond
el: ζωμός
eo: buljono
es: caldo, Caldos
et: puljong
eu: Salda
fa: گوشتابه
fi: liemi, liemivalmiste
fr: bouillon, Bouillons
ga: anraith
gd: brot
gl: Caldo
he: ציר
hi: यखनी
hr: bujon
hu: Húsleves
hy: արգանակ
ia: Bouillon
id: Kaldu
io: Buliono
is: seyði
it: brodo
ja: ブイヨン, 出汁, だし
ko: 브로스
lb: Britt
li: Boeljóng
lt: Sultinys
mk: бујо́н
ms: kaldu
mt: brodu
nb: buljong
nl: bouillon, Bouillons
nn: buljong
pa: ਸ਼ੋਰਬਾ
pl: Wywar, bulion
pt: caldo
ro: supă
ru: бульон
sq: supë
sv: buljong, buljongpreparat
tl: Tsaa ng karneng baka
tr: Etsuyu
uk: Бульйон
uz: sho'rva
vi: canh
yi: יויך
zh: 清汤

en: beef broth, beef stock
bg: говежди бульон
ca: brou de bou
cs: hovězí vývar
de: Rinderbrühe, Rindfleischbouillon
es: Caldo de carne de vaca
fi: naudanlihaliemi
fr: bouillon de bœuf, bouillon de boeuf
hr: goveđa juha
it: brodo di manzo
nl: runderbuillon
pl: bulion wołowy
sv: nötköttsbuljong

en: dehydrated beef stock, dehydrated beef bouillon
fr: Bouillon de boeuf déshydraté
it: brodo di manzo disidratato

en: beef bone stock powder
da: bouillonpulver af oskeben
fi: liemijauhe häränluista
nb: buljongpulver av oskekjøttben
sv: buljongpulver av oxben